Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.230

Priorities.

(1) Allowed claims in a general receivership shall receive distribution under this chapter in the order of priority under (a) through (h) of this subsection and, with the exception of (a) and (c) of this subsection, on a pro rata basis.

(a) Creditors with liens on property of the estate, which liens are duly perfected under applicable law, shall receive the proceeds from the disposition of their collateral. However, the receiver may recover from property securing an allowed secured claim the reasonable, necessary expenses of preserving, protecting, or disposing of the property to the extent of any benefit to the creditors. If and to the extent that the proceeds are less than the amount of a creditor's allowed claim or a creditor's lien is avoided on any basis, the creditor is an unsecured claim under (h) of this subsection. Secured claims shall be paid from the proceeds in accordance with their respective priorities under otherwise applicable law.

(b) Actual, necessary costs and expenses incurred during the administration of the estate, other than those expenses allowable under (a) of this subsection, including allowed fees and reimbursement of reasonable charges and expenses of the receiver and professional persons employed by the receiver under RCW 7.60.180. Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, expenses incurred during the administration of the estate have priority over the secured claim of any creditor obtaining or consenting to the appointment of the receiver.

(c) Creditors with liens on property of the estate, which liens have not been duly perfected under applicable law, shall receive the proceeds from the disposition of their collateral if and to the extent that unsecured claims are made subject to those liens under applicable law.

(d) Claims for wages, salaries, or commissions, including vacation, severance, and sick leave pay, or contributions to an employee benefit plan, earned by the claimant within one hundred eighty days of the date of appointment of the receiver or the cessation of the estate's business, whichever occurs first, but only to the extent of ten thousand nine hundred fifty dollars.

(e) Allowed unsecured claims, to the extent of two thousand four hundred twenty-five dollars for each individual, arising from the deposit with the person over whose property the receiver is appointed before the date of appointment of the receiver of money in connection with the purchase, lease, or rental of property or the purchase of services for personal, family, or household use by individuals that were not delivered or provided.

(f) Claims for a support debt as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(10), but not to the extent that the debt (i) is assigned to another entity, voluntarily, by operation of law, or otherwise; or (ii) includes a liability designated as a support obligation unless that liability is actually in the nature of a support obligation.

(g) Unsecured claims of governmental units for taxes which accrued prior to the date of appointment of the receiver.

(h) Other unsecured claims.

(2) If all of the classes under subsection (1) of this section have been paid in full, any residue shall be paid to the person over whose property the receiver is appointed.

[ 2011 c 34 s 8; 2004 c 165 s 25.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.